Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-305
Alcohol or drug abuse, defined.

Alcohol or drug abuse means the abuse of alcohol or other drugs which have significant mood or perception changing capacities, which are likely to be physiologically or psychologically addictive, and the use of which have negative physical, social, or psychological consequences.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 156.